Massachusetts, session 194th, H4890.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1: Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the City of
Quincy Retirement Board shall apply the presumptions afforded by Section 94, 94A and 94B of
Chapter 32 of General Laws, as follows to certain public safety personnel in the City of Quincy
who apply for Accidental Disability Retirement pursuant to Section 7 of said Chapter 32 in the
same manner in Section 2.
SECTION 2. If the member's employer cannot locate or otherwise failed to maintain a
complete record of the member's physical examination into service, the member or employer
may submit an Affidavit attesting that the member did undergo an examination and that the
examination failed to reveal any evidence of the disabling condition for which the member is
seeking Accidental Disability Retirement. This Affidavit shall constitute substantial evidence
that the member successfully underwent a pre-employment physical examination as required by
of 2

Sections 94, 94A and 94B and that said physical did not reveal any evidence of the disabling
condition for which the member is seeking Accidental Disability Retirement, as further
evidenced by the member's acceptance into service.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2